Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-9,115.02
Class V School Expense Fund; Class V School Employees Retirement Fund; assets; investment.

Beginning September 1, 2024, all assets of the retirement system shall be credited, according to the purpose for which they are held, to the Class V School Expense Fund or to the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund. Any money in the funds available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB147, § 39.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.